Louisiana, session 2026, HB781.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:508(A)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 47:508.1
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§508. Registration; commercial vehicles; fleet cycles; exemption
A.
* * *
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, every
registration of an automobile or truck to be used as a commercial rental or leased
vehicle shall expire one year from the date of issuance and shall be renewed annually
thereafter. However, vehicles registered under the fleet registration program
established in R.S. 47:508.1 may be enrolled under an annual or biennial fleet cycle
administered by the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, with proration for partial annual additions as provided in R.S. 47:508.1.
* * *
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 781 ENROLLED
§508.1. Fleet vehicle registration program; procedures; fleet license plates; audits
A. When used in this Section, the following terms shall have the following
respective meanings:
(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles.
(2) "Fleet" means a group of motor vehicles owned or leased and titled in the
name of a single registered fleet owner, consisting of two hundred fifty or more
vehicles required to be registered under this Chapter.
(3) "Registered fleet owner" means an entity approved by the office of motor
vehicles under this Section to register vehicles as a fleet. The term includes a leasing
or rental company as defined in R.S. 22:1762.
B. Notwithstanding R.S. 47:501 and the renewal periods provided in R.S.
47:508, the commissioner shall establish a system for the registration of all fleet
vehicles owned or purchased by a registered fleet owner pursuant to this Section. The
commissioner shall establish forms and procedures for initial fleet registration and
for periodic updates.
C.(1) Any owner of two hundred fifty or more motor vehicles required to be
registered under this Chapter may apply to be a registered fleet owner. Upon
approval, the commissioner shall issue a unique fleet identification number to the
registered fleet owner.
(2) The commissioner may deny, suspend, or revoke fleet status for
noncompliance with this Section, including failure to maintain security, failure to
remit fees or taxes, the misuse of plates, failure to provide records, or any other rules
adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this Section.
D.(1) A registered fleet owner may elect to register its fleet on an annual or
biennial basis in lieu of the standard cycles under R.S. 47:508.
(2) When biennial registration is sought for vehicles added mid-cycle, an
additional full annual fee shall be added to the partial annual prorated fee.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 781 ENROLLED
E. Vehicles subject to Louisiana safety inspection requirements shall comply
prior to issuance or renewal as applicable. For rental or leased fleet vehicles, a valid
brake tag or inspection certification shall remain effective for the duration of the
rental or lease term. Reinspection or issuance of a new inspection sticker shall not
be required during that period. The director may authorize electronic proof of
inspection in fleet application.
F.(1) A registered fleet owner shall maintain proof of financial responsibility
meeting the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Law, R.S. 32:851 et seq.
(2) For rental companies, allocation of primary and secondary coverage shall
be as provided in R.S. 22:1296, and the definitions applicable to motor vehicle rental
insurers shall be as provided in R.S. 22:1762.
G.(1) The commissioner may issue a unique fleet license plate or validation
registration indicator for vehicles in a registered fleet. The registration plates may
be transferred among vehicles within the fleet subject to reporting and audit controls.
(2) Unassigned plate inventory shall be secured and reconciled in accordance
with the rules adopted by the commissioner.
H. Automobiles, vans, and sport utility vehicles used as commercial rental
or daily leased vehicles shall be issued plates in accordance with the Department of
Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, policies or rules governing
commercial plate classifications, including any successor classifications.
I.(1) The commissioner shall provide technical specifications for secure
electronic data exchange to support daily or periodic fleet registration updates, title
submissions, and plate transfers.
(2) A registered fleet owner shall retain records for at least five years and
maintain the records for audit.
J. All license taxes and registration fees shall be computed under this
Chapter, including R.S. 47:508, and applicable plate-class schedules. The
commissioner may authorize consolidated monthly remittance and reconciliation of
fees and taxes for registered fleet owners.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 781 ENROLLED
K. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, may adopt rules in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to
implement this Section and shall coordinate with the division of administration, the
Department of Revenue, and the Louisiana Public Service Commission with respect
to regulated carriers, as applicable.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2028, or when the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, electronic vehicle
and registration system is updated to comply with the statutory provisions contained in this
Act, whichever occurs first.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.